Illinois, session 104th, SB1670.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Family Bereavement Leave Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 154/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Assisted reproduction" means a method of achieving a 9pregnancy through an artificial insemination or an embryo 10transfer and includes gamete and embryo donation. "Assisted 11reproduction" does not include any pregnancy achieved through 12sexual intercourse. 13    "Child" means an employee's son or daughter who is a 14biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal 15ward, or a child of a person standing in loco parentis.16    "Covered companion animal" means an animal, owned by the 17employee, that is commonly considered to be, or is considered 18by the owner to be, a pet. "Covered companion animal" 19includes, but is not limited to, canines, felines, equines, 20and specialty pets as defined in subsection (u) of Section 3 of 21the Illinois Commercial Feed Act of 1961. 22    "Covered family member" means an employee's child, 23stepchild, spouse, domestic partner, sibling, parent,   SB1670- 2 -LRB104 06952 SPS 16989 b1mother-in-law, father-in-law, grandchild, grandparent, or 2stepparent.3    "Department" means the Department of Labor.4    "Domestic partner", used with respect to an unmarried 5employee, includes: 6        (1) the person recognized as the domestic partner of 7    the employee under any domestic partnership or civil union 8    law of a state or political subdivision of a state; or9        (2) an unmarried adult person who is in a committed, 10    personal relationship with the employee, who is not a 11    domestic partner as described in paragraph (1) to or in 12    such a relationship with any other person, and who is 13    designated to the employee's employer by such employee as 14    that employee's domestic partner. 15    "Department" means the Department of Labor.16    "Employee" means eligible employee, as defined by Section 17101(2) of the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 18U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).19    "Employer" means employer, as defined by Section 101(4) of 20the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 212601 et seq.).22(Source: P.A. 102-1050, eff. 1-1-23.) 23    (820 ILCS 154/10)24    Sec. 10. Bereavement leave.25    (a) All employees shall be entitled to use a maximum of 2   SB1670- 3 -LRB104 06952 SPS 16989 b1weeks (10 work days) of unpaid bereavement leave to:2        (1) attend the funeral or alternative to a funeral of 3    a covered family member;4        (2) make arrangements necessitated by the death of the 5    covered family member;6        (3) grieve the death of the covered family member; or 7        (4) be absent from work due to (i) a miscarriage; (ii) 8    an unsuccessful round of intrauterine insemination or of 9    an assisted reproductive technology procedure; (iii) a 10    failed adoption match or an adoption that is not finalized 11    because it is contested by another party; (iv) a failed 12    surrogacy agreement; (v) a diagnosis that negatively 13    impacts pregnancy or fertility; or (vi) a stillbirth. 14    (a-5) All employees shall be entitled to use a maximum of 15one week (5 work days) of unpaid bereavement leave to grieve 16the death of a covered companion animal.17    (b) Bereavement leave under subsections subsection (a) and 18(a-5) of this Section must be completed within 60 days after 19the date on which the employee receives notice of the death of 20the covered family member or covered companion animal or the 21date on which an event listed under paragraph (4) of 22subsection (a) occurs.23    (c) An employee shall provide the employer with at least 2448 hours' advance notice of the employee's intention to take 25bereavement leave, unless providing such notice is not 26reasonable and practicable.  SB1670- 4 -LRB104 06952 SPS 16989 b1    (d) An employer may, but is not required to, require 2reasonable documentation. Documentation may include a death 3certificate, a published obituary, or written verification of 4death, burial, or memorial services from a mortuary, funeral 5home, burial society, crematorium, religious institution, 6veterinarian, or government agency. For leave resulting from 7an event listed under paragraph (4) of subsection (a), 8reasonable documentation shall include a form, to be provided 9by the Department, to be filled out by a health care 10practitioner who has treated the employee or the employee's 11spouse or domestic partner, or surrogate, for an event listed 12under paragraph (4) of subsection (a), or documentation from 13the adoption or surrogacy organization that the employee 14worked with related to an event listed under paragraph (4) of 15subsection (a), certifying that the employee or his or her 16spouse or domestic partner has experienced an event listed 17under paragraph (4) of subsection (a). The employer may not 18require that the employee identify which category of event the 19leave pertains to as a condition of exercising rights under 20this Act. 21    (e) In the event of the death of more than one covered 22family member in a 12-month period, an employee is entitled to 23up to a total of 6 weeks (30 work days) of bereavement leave 24during the 12-month period. In the event of the death of more 25than one covered companion animal in a 12-month period, an 26employee is entitled to up to a total of 2 weeks (10 work days)   SB1670- 5 -LRB104 06952 SPS 16989 b1of bereavement leave during the 12-month period. This Act does 2not create a right for an employee to take unpaid leave that 3exceeds the unpaid leave time allowed under, or is in addition 4to the unpaid leave time permitted by, the federal Family and 5Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).6(Source: P.A. 102-1050, eff. 1-1-23.)